src/fst/incoming/unified_affixes_with_morphophonemes.lex.txt
LEXICON VERB_ENDINGS
+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE:%>%^ENDC # ;
+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDFga # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDC # ;
+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDGgáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDBgán # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDEáa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDEáan # ;
+V+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDCs # ;
+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>%^ENDEáas # ;
+V+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDH%áng # ;
+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDEáa%.ang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgánggang # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDBgangáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgíinii # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDAgáangaa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáangaan # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>%^ENDCäsáa # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>%^ENDCäs # ;
+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDCäsáang # ;
+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDCäsga # ;
+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDCäsáas # ;
+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDCäsáa%.ang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasa'áa # ;
+V+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasa'áang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaasdláa # ;
+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaasdláang # ;
+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDC'úuj # ;
+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDC'úujang # ;
+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>%^ENDCäsáa'uujang # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDC'us # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDC'ujáa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDC'úujaangaa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDCäsáa'us # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>%^ENDD'ahlánggang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST:%>%^ENDD'ahlánggan # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDD'ahlánggiinii # ;
+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>%^ENDCäsáa'ahlans # ;
+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDD'ahláns # ;
+V+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDEáa'ahlang # ;
+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>%^ENDEáa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>%^ENDEáa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+REFLEXIVE:%>%^ENDD'ahl # ;
+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>%^ENDCäséehl # ;
+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:%>%^ENDA'úu # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'wägán # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áawaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áawaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>%^ENDA'áawaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'áawaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng'waa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng'waang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDBgáng'waa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'wägíinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'wägáangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'wägáangaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>%^ENDA'wáaäs # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsga # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasa'áa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasa'áang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaasdláa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaasdláang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa'uuj # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ujaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'wáa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>%^ENDA'áawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáa'ahl # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>%^ENDA'wáaäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'ángga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'ánggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áns # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>%^ENDA'áangaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'angáng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'áangaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng'anggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDBgáng'angang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'ánggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'ánggaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'ánggaangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>%^ENDA'ángäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaa'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaa'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaasdlä'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDH%.áng% %^WSñasaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áang'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áang'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áang'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'ángäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áang'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áangaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>%^ENDA'áangaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áangaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE:%>%^ENDA'áang'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>%^ENDA'ángäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'uu # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'wägan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng'ang'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDBgáng'ang'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDBgáng'ang'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'wägíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'wägáangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'wägáangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaa'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaa'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaasdlä'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'wáa%.áng% %^WSñasaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>%^ENDA'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waa'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>%^ENDA'áng'waaäseehl # ;
